Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1905
Licensed practitioner, defined.

Licensed practitioner means a person licensed to practice medicine, dentistry, podiatry, chiropractic, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or as an osteopathic physician.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 643.